Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 75.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
81-1413.01
Nebraska
Law Enforcement Training Center Cash Fund; created; purpose; investment.

There
is hereby created the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center Cash Fund.
All receipts for tuition and fees paid to the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training
Center shall be paid into the state treasury and by the State Treasurer credited
to the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center Cash Fund. Such fund shall
be used to defray the expenses of the training center, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Nebraska
Law Enforcement Training Center Cash Fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1971, LB 223, § 1;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 75.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.